New York, session 2025-2026, S4802.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 43 of the volunteer firefighters' benefit law, as 2 amended by chapter 336 of the laws of 1957, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 43. Determination of claims for benefits. The provisions of section 5 twenty of the [workmen's] workers' compensation law shall be applicable 6 as fully as if set forth in this chapter, except that the waiting period 7 of seven days for the presentation of claims for benefits shall not 8 apply to the presentation of claims for benefits under this chapter, and 9 a hearing ordered by the chair or board shall occur within one hundred 10 twenty days after a claim for compensation is submitted under this chap- 11 ter, provided that failure of such hearing to occur within one hundred 12 twenty days of such submission shall default such claim in the claim- 13 ant's favor, including full payment of the award, determining such claim 14 for compensation. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09577-01-5